District of Columbia statutes.
31-3710

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter within 180 days of October 1, 1992. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved. Nothing in this section shall affect any requirements imposed upon the Mayor by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

The Mayor may issue emergency rules without prior Council approval, which shall be effective for not more than 120 days.

History

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 11, 39 DCR 5825

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3706.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-2620.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.

Resolutions

Resolution 16-394, Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Approval Resolution of 2005“, was approved effective November 26, 2005.

Resolution 16-788, the “Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective August 11, 2006.

Resolution 18-298, the “Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Approval Resolution of 2009”, was approved effective November 3, 2009.